Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.070

Fee, commission, or compensation—When permitted.

(1) Except as otherwise permitted by this section, a mortgage broker must not receive a fee, commission, or compensation of any kind in connection with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a residential mortgage loan unless a borrower actually obtains a loan from a lender on the terms and conditions agreed upon by the borrower and mortgage broker. A loan originator may not accept a fee, commission, or compensation of any kind from borrowers in connection with the preparation, negotiation, and brokering of a residential mortgage loan.

(2) A mortgage broker may:

(a) If the mortgage broker has obtained for the borrower a written commitment from a lender for a loan on the terms and conditions agreed upon by the borrower and the mortgage broker, and the borrower fails to close on the loan through no fault of the mortgage broker, charge a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars for services rendered, preparation of documents, or transfer of documents in the borrower's file which were prepared or paid for by the borrower if the fee is not otherwise prohibited by the truth in lending act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601, and Regulation Z, 12 C.F.R. Part 1026, as now or hereafter amended; or

(b) Solicit or receive fees for third party provider goods or services in advance. Fees for any goods or services not provided must be refunded to the borrower and the mortgage broker may not charge more for the goods and services than the actual costs of the goods or services charged by the third party provider.

(3) A loan originator may not solicit or receive fees for a third-party provider of goods or services except that a loan originator may transfer funds from a borrower to a licensed mortgage broker, exempt mortgage broker, or third-party provider, if the loan originator does not deposit, hold, retain, or use the funds for any purpose other than the payment of bona fide fees to third-party providers.

[ 2015 c 229 s 10; 2006 c 19 s 8; 1993 c 468 s 13; 1987 c 391 s 9.]

NOTES:

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.